Hawaii statutes.
[§231-9.2] Offers in
compromise. (a) Requests for compromises authorized under
section 231-3 shall be submitted to the department and accompanied by the
following:

(1) In the case of a lump-sum offer in compromise,
twenty per cent of the amount of the offer; or

(2) In the case of a periodic payment offer in
compromise, payment in the amount of the first proposed installment. Any
failure to make an installment other than the first installment due under the
offer in compromise, during the period the offer is being evaluated by the
department, may be treated by the department as a withdrawal of the offer in
compromise.

(b) Where an offer in compromise is not
accepted by the department for any reason, payments made under subsection (a)
shall be applied to the tax first assessed or other amounts imposed under title
14.

(c) The department may waive the payment
requirements under subsection (a) for individual taxpayers who meet the
low-income certification guidelines published by the Internal Revenue Service
for the period in which the request for compromise has been submitted.

(d) The director of taxation shall
prepare any forms that may be necessary to meet the requirements of this
section. In addition to any other administrative requirements, the director
of taxation may also require the taxpayer to furnish reasonable information to
ascertain the validity of the request for payment waiver made under subsection
(c).

(e) The department may adopt rules
pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to effectuate the purposes of this section.

(f) As used in this section:

"Lump-sum offer in compromise" means
any offer of payments made in five or fewer installments.

"Periodic payment offer in
compromise" means any offer of payments made in six or more installments. [L
2013, c 6, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next